hi_android/foma/magyar.foma
# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup      "^"        -> 0;
define CleanupEndingsFn  "^" "+" {cDis}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cEss}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSoc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cTem}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss1p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss2p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss3p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp1p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp2p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp3p}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss1s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss2s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPosss3s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp1s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp2s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPossp3s}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPlur}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFam}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cGenpl} -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cGens}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAbl}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAcc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cnAcc}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAde}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAll}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCau}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDat}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDel}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cEla}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFac}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cFor}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccForp}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cxForpen}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIll}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIne}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIns}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cNom}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSub}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSue}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cSup}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cTer}  -> 0;
                      
define CleanupEndingsIge  "^" "+" {cRep}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cImp}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf11}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf13}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf21}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf22}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccInf23}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cInf}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cAdv}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {ccAdvan}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cNrep}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPot}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cPDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cCDefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjIndefPl3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSgp12}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefSg3}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl1}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl2}  -> 0 ,,
                       "^" "+" {cConjDefPl3}  -> 0 ;

echo ">>> read in magyarfnevek.lexc <<<"       
read lexc magyarfnevek.lexc
substitute defined PotentialWord for "[Guess]"
define Lexiconfnevek

define Grammarfnevek Lexiconfnevek           .o. 
				AddTag           .o.
	            Etoee             .o. 
               Atoaa             .o. 
               EetoeAcc          .o. # é
               IitoiAcc3         .o. # í
               UeuetoueAcc3      .o. # ű
               AatoaAcc3         .o. # á
               UutouAcc3         .o. # ú
               Changez2          .o.
#               HarmRulejaje      .o. 
                CleanupEndingsFn        .o.
#               Suffixb           .o. 
#               Suffixh           .o. 
#               Suffixk           .o. 
#               Suffixn           .o. 
#               Suffixr           .o. 
               Suffixt           .o. 
#               HarmRulePlur      .o. 
#               HarmRulePluroe    .o.
#               HarmRuleJJ1         .o. 
#               HarmRuleJnull1         .o. 
#               HarmRuleul        .o. 
#               HarmRuleuk        .o. 
#               HarmRuleenkent    .o. 
#               HarmRuleestul     .o. 
#               HarmRuleunk       .o. 
#               HarmRuleotok1     .o. 
#               HarmRuleotok2     .o. 
#               HarmRuleJP        .o. 
#               HarmRuleJPJ1        .o. 
#               HarmRuleJPnull1        .o. 
#               HarmRuleai        .o. 
#               HarmRuleaitok2    .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc       .o. 
               HarmRuleAcc1      .o. 
#               HarmRuletol       .o. 
#               HarmRulehoz       .o. 
#               HarmRuleVV        .o. 
#               HarmRuleVVH       .o.
#               HarmRuleVVdzs     .o.
#               HarmRuleonen      .o. 
#               HarmRulePlurmely18  .o. 
#               HarmRuleulmely      .o. 
#               HarmRuleestulmely   .o. 
#               HarmRuletolmely     .o. 
               HarmRuleAccmely     .o. 
#               HarmRulehozmely     .o. 
#               HarmRuleonenmely    .o. 
#               HarmRuleenkentmely  .o.
               Cleanup           .o.
               ToUpCase;

echo ">>> read in magyarigek.lexc <<<"       
read lexc magyarigek.lexc
define Lexiconigek

define Grammarigek  Filter1               .o. 
                Lexiconigek               .o.                
                CleanupEndingsIge        .o.
                Suffixl               .o.
                HarmRuleAAA           .o. 
                HarmRuleAA            .o.                
                HarmRuleIgeu          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeuo         .o.
                HarmRuleIgea          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgee          .o.
                HarmRuleIgeo          .o.  
                HarmRuleIgeoe         .o.  
                HarmRuleIgeoue        .o.
                HarmRuleIgeo2         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeaa         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeija1        .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejatokitek1  .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejakik1      .o. 
                HarmRuleIgetattet     .o.
                HarmRuleeo            .o.
                HarmRulefelteo        .o.
                HarmRulefelteo1       .o.
                HarmRulefelteo3       .o.
                HarmRulej             .o.
                HarmRuletatt             .o.
                HarmRuleszorelol      .o.
                HarmRulesj            .o.
                HarmRulesj3            .o.
                HarmRuleess           .o.
                HarmRuleAAAmely           .o. 
                HarmRuleAAmely            .o.                
                HarmRuleIgeumely          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeamely          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeuomely          .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeemely          .o.
                HarmRuleIgeomely          .o.  
                HarmRuleIgeo2mely         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeaamely         .o. 
                HarmRuleIgeija1mely        .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejatokitek1mely  .o. 
                HarmRuleIgejakik1mely      .o. 
                HarmRuleIgetattetmely     .o.
                HarmRuleeomely            .o.
                HarmRulefelteomely        .o.
                HarmRuleszorelolmely      .o.
                HarmRulenook              .o.
                HarmRulenookmely          .o.
                Cleanup                 .o.
                ToUpCase ;         

regex Grammarfnevek|Grammarigek;
